src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/noun-odd_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Oddsyllable nouns belonging to MALIS, SEAMU, GAHPIR, BOAHTIN, LEXDIMINC

Tests:
  Noun - eappir: # MALIS
    eappir+N+Sg+Nom: eappir
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen: [eabbára, eabbár]
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: eabbáreame
    eappir+N+Sg+Ill: eabbárii
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [eabbáriinnán, eabbáriinnám, eabbáriinnin, eabbáriinnim, eabbáriinnen, eabbáriinnem]
    eappir+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: eabbáriiddámeguin
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: eabbáraččain
    eappir+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: [eappirlažžan, eappirlážžan]
    
  Noun - guora: # SEAMU
    guora+N+Sg+Nom: guora
    guora+N+Sg+Gen: [guorraga, guorrat]
    guora+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorrageame
    guora+N+Sg+Ill: guorragii
    guora+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [guorragiinnán, guorragiinnám, guorragiinnin, guorragiinnim, guorragiinnen, guorragiinnem]
    guora+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorragiiddámeguin
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: guorragaččain

  Noun - guorbban: # GAHPIR
    guorbban+N+Sg+Nom: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen: [guorbbana, guorbban]
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorbbaneame
    guorbban+N+Sg+Ill: guorbbanii
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [guorbbaniinnán, guorbbaniinnám, guorbbaniinnin, guorbbaniinnim, guorbbaniinnen, guorbbaniinnem]
    guorbban+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorbbaniiddámeguin
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: guorbbanaččain
    guorbban+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: [guorbbanlažžan, guorbbanlážžan]

  Noun - fierdin: # BOAHTIN
    fierdin+N+Sg+Nom: fierdin
    fierdin+N+Sg+Gen: [fierdin, fierdima]
    fierdin+N+Sg+Ill: fierdimii

  Noun - linnjaságastallan: # BOAHTALADDAN
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Nom: linnjaságastallan
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Gen: [linnjaságastallan, linnjaságastallama]
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Ill: linnjaságastallamii

  Noun - steriilaguovddáš: # LEXDIMINC
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: steriilaguovddáš-
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Nom: steriilaguovddáš
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Gen: [steriilaguovddáža, steriilaguovddáš]
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: steriilaguovddážeame
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Ill: steriilaguovddážii
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [steriilaguovddážiinnán, steriilaguovddážiinnám, steriilaguovddážiinnin, steriilaguovddážiinnim, steriilaguovddážiinnen, steriilaguovddážiinnem]
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: steriilaguovddážiiddámeguin
